New York, session 2025-2026, S8407.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 2 of section 493 of the social services law, as 2 added by section 1 of part B of chapter 501 of the laws of 2012, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 2. For substantiated reports of abuse or neglect in facilities or 5 provider agencies in receipt of medical assistance and which are no 6 longer subject to amendment or appeal pursuant to section four hundred 7 ninety-four of this article, such information shall also be forwarded by 8 the justice center to the office of the Medicaid inspector general when 9 such abuse or neglect may [be relevant to an investigation of unaccepta- 10 ble practices as such practices are defined] result in [regulations of] 11 possible exclusion or other sanction by the office of the Medicaid 12 inspector general as determined in consultation with the office of the 13 Medicaid inspector general. 14 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09970-01-5